Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-522
Grounds; abandonment; sale; notice of petition; contents; form.

Upon the filing of such petition, due notice of the same shall be given all the members of such association, and all other persons interested therein, and in the real estate or other property of such association, by causing a notice of the application to be published in some weekly newspaper printed and published and of general circulation in the county where the action is brought for three successive weeks, which notice shall be substantially in the following form:

LEGAL NOTICE

The members of the ................... Cemetery Association of ...................., Nebraska, and all other persons interested in the association and in the real estate or other property of the association, are hereby notified that on the ..... day of ........ 20...., the association, filed its petition in the district court of ............... County, Nebraska, the object and prayer of which is (here set forth in at least a general way the object sought and relief prayed for in the petition).

Any person desiring to oppose the granting of the relief sought by or the prayer of the petition is required to file an objection in writing with the clerk of the district court as required by law on or before Monday, the .... day of ............ 20.... . Dated ........., 20.... .

............ Cemetery Association of............, NE.Petitioner.

Laws 1907, c. 27, § 2, p. 147;

R.S.1913, § 689;

C.S.1922, § 598;

C.S.1929, § 13-511;

R.S.1943, § 12-522;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 2.